New York, session 2025-2026, S2392.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 103-a of the public officers law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision 2-a to read as follows: 3 2-a. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any member who has a 4 disability as defined in section two hundred ninety-two of the executive 5 law that renders such member unable to be physically present at any 6 meeting location may be considered present for purposes of fulfilling 7 the quorum requirement for the public body at meetings conducted through 8 videoconferencing, provided the applicable criteria in subdivision two 9 of this section are otherwise met. 10 § 2. Section 4 of part WW of chapter 56 of the laws of 2022 amending 11 the public officers law relating to permitting videoconferencing and 12 remote participation in public meetings under certain circumstances, as 13 amended by section 1 of part KK of chapter 58 of the laws of 2024, is 14 amended to read as follows: 15 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately [and shall expire and be 16 deemed repealed July 1, 2026]. 17 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04677-02-6